fr: Longueur de la tige des pointes: Longueur 1/2; Longueur 2/3; Longueur 3/4; Longueur totale; Autre
nl: Lengte van zool van spitzen: 1/2 lengte; 2/3 lengte; 3/4 lengte; Volledige lengte; Overig
bg-BG: Дължина на подметката на палците: Дължина 1/2; Дължина 2/3; Дължина 3/4; Пълна дължина; Други
hr-HR: Duljina špange baletne papučice: 1/2 duljine; 2/3 duljine; 3/4 duljine; Puna duljina; Ostalo
nb: Lengde på støttesåle for dansesko: 1/2 lengde; 2/3 lengde; 3/4 lengde; Full lengde; Annet
ko: 토슈즈 지지대 길이: 1/2 길이; 2/3 길이; 3/4 길이; 전체 길이; 기타
pt-BR: Sapatilha de ponta, comprimento da alma: Comprimento 1/2; Comprimento 2/3; Comprimento 3/4; Comprimento inteiro; Outro
fi: Varvastossun anturan pituus: 1/2-pituus; 2/3-pituus; 3/4-pituus; Täyspitkä; Muu
sv: Skaftlängd för spetssko: 1/2 längd; 2/3 längd; 3/4 längd; Fullängd; Övrigt
ru: Длина стельки пуантов: 1/2 длины; 2/3 длины; 3/4 длины; Полная длина; Другое
pt-PT: Comprimento da palmilha das sapatilhas de ponta: Comprimento de 1/2; Comprimento de 2/3; Comprimento de 3/4; Comprimento total; Outro
zh-CN: 足尖鞋鞋底板长度: 1/2 长度; 2/3 长度; 3/4 长度; 全长; 其他
es: Largo del cambrillón de la zapatilla de punta: 1/2 longitud; 2/3 longitud; 3/4 longitud; Longitud completa; Otro
hu: Spicc cipő talpbetét hossza: 1/2-es hossz; 2/3-os hossz; 3/4-es hossz; Teljes hossz; Egyéb
cs: Délka výztuhy baletní špičky: 1/2 délky; 2/3 délky; 3/4 délky; Celá délka; Jiné
da: Skaftlængde for tåspidssko: 1/2 længde; 2/3 længde; 3/4 længde; Fuld længde; Andet
tr: Point ayakkabı taban sertliği uzunluğu: 1/2 uzunluk; 2/3 uzunluk; 3/4 uzunluk; Tam uzunluk; Diğer
sl-SI: Dolžina podplata baletnega copata: 1/2 dolžine; 2/3 dolžine; 3/4 dolžine; Polna dolžina; Drugo
sk-SK: Dĺžka holene špičky: 1/2 dĺžka; 2/3 dĺžka; 3/4 dĺžka; Plná dĺžka; Iné
th: ความยาวของแกนรองเท้าบัลเล่ต์: ความยาว 1/2; ความยาว 2/3; ความยาว 3/4; เต็มความยาว; อื่นๆ
it: Lunghezza della suola della scarpa da punta: Lunghezza 1/2; Lunghezza 2/3; Lunghezza 3/4; Lunghezza intera; Altro
ro-RO: Lungime a tălpii poantelor: Lungime 1/2; Lungime 2/3; Lungime 3/4; Lungime completă; Altele
vi: Chiều dài gân giày múa ba lê: 1/2 chiều dài; 2/3 chiều dài; 3/4 chiều dài; Chiều dài đầy đủ; Khác
el: Μήκος σόλας πουέντ: 1/2 μήκος; 2/3 μήκος; 3/4 μήκος; Πλήρες μήκος; Άλλο
de: Länge der Spitzenschuhinnensohle: 1/2-Länge; 2/3-Länge; 3/4-Länge; Ganze Länge; Sonstige
zh-TW: 硬鞋鞋楦長度: 1/2 長度; 2/3 長度; 3/4 長度; 全長; 其他
lt-LT: Puantų standiklio ilgis: 1/2 ilgio; 2/3 ilgio; 3/4 ilgio; Viso ilgio; Kita
en: Pointe shoe shank length: 1/2 length; 2/3 length; 3/4 length; Full length; Other
pl: Długość podeszwy usztywniającej pointy: 1/2 długości; 2/3 długości; 3/4 długości; Pełna długość; Inna
ja: ポワントシューズシャンク長さ: 1/2レングス; 2/3レングス; 3/4レングス; フルレングス; その他